Louisiana, session 2026, HB200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:1236(21)(b)(i), (iv), (v), and (vii) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 33:1236(21)(i) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1236. Powers of parish governing authorities
The police juries and other parish governing authorities shall have the
following powers:
* * *
(21)
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-345 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 200
(b)(i) The governing authority of the parishes of Jefferson and St. Bernard
Parish may enact ordinances regulating or prohibiting the growth or accumulation
of grass, obnoxious weeds, or other deleterious or unhealthful growths, trash, debris,
refuse, or discarded or noxious matter.
* * *
(iv) Upon failure of any such property owner to pay the charges, the
governing authority may file a certified copy of the charges with the recorder of
mortgages, and the same, when so filed and recorded, shall operate as a lien and
privilege in favor of the parish against the property on which the matter was cut or
removed. In the parishes of Jefferson and St. Bernard Parish, the lien and privilege
granted under this Paragraph, when recorded within sixty days from the date of
completion of the cutting or removal, shall have the same ranking as an ad valorem
tax lien on immovable property as provided in R.S. 9:4821(A)(1).
(v) The parish may, at its option, enact ordinances to add cutting and
removal charges to the annual ad valorem tax bill of the property involved. In the
parishes of Jefferson and St. Bernard Parish, if such charges are unpaid, the ad
valorem tax lien imposed thereby and such rights attendant thereto shall coexist with
those granted under Item (iv) of this Subparagraph.
* * *
(vii) In the exercise of the authority granted by this Subparagraph to the
parishes of Jefferson and St. Bernard Parish, the respective parish shall be the sole
and proper defendant in any action, authorized by law, to contest the addition of such
charges to the ad valorem tax bill of the property involved.
* * *
(i)(i) The governing authority of St. Bernard Parish may enact ordinances
regulating or prohibiting the growth or accumulation of grass, obnoxious weeds, or
other deleterious or unhealthful growths, trash, debris, refuse, or discarded or
noxious matter.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-345 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 200
(ii) In the exercise of the authority granted by this Subparagraph, the parish
governing authority may, among other things, but not by way of limitation, require
or compel property owners to cut or remove such grass, obnoxious weeds, or other
deleterious or unhealthful growths, trash, debris, refuse, or discarded or noxious
matter on their property.
(iii) If the owner of any lot located within recognized subdivisions outside
municipalities in the parish fails to cut or remove such matter when requested to do
so by the governing authority, within seven days after receipt of such request or
notice by a registered or certified letter or other adequate notice, the governing
authority may have such matter cut or removed and may charge such property owner
in accordance with regulations adopted by the governing authority.
(iv) Upon failure of any such property owner to pay the charges, the
governing authority may file a certified copy of the charges with the recorder of
mortgages, and the same, when so filed and recorded, shall operate as a lien and
privilege in favor of the parish against the property on which the matter was cut or
removed. In St. Bernard Parish, the lien and privilege granted under this Paragraph,
when recorded within sixty days from the date of completion of the cutting or
removal, shall have the same ranking as an ad valorem tax lien on immovable
property as provided in R.S. 9:4821(A)(1).
(v) The parish may, at its option, enact ordinances to add cutting and
removal charges to the annual ad valorem tax bill of the property involved. In St.
Bernard Parish, if such charges are unpaid, the ad valorem tax lien imposed thereby
and such rights attendant thereto shall coexist with those granted under Item (iv) of
this Subparagraph.
(vi) If such ordinances are enacted, the sheriff effecting collection shall be
reimbursed by the governing authority for any amount equal to fifteen percent of the
amount of such charges actually collected from the property owner. This collection
charge shall be in addition to such charges and shall also be added to the ad valorem
tax bill of the property involved.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-345 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 200
(vii) In the exercise of the authority granted by this Subparagraph to
St. Bernard Parish, the parish shall be the sole and proper defendant in any action,
authorized by law, to contest the addition of such charges to the ad valorem tax bill
of the property involved.
* * *